North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 2. Formation; Articles of Organization; Amendment of Articles; Annual Report.

§ 57D-2-20.
Formation.

One or more persons may cause an LLC to be formed by delivering executed articles of organization to the Secretary of State for filing in accordance with this Chapter and Chapter 55D of the General Statutes. An LLC may also be formed through the conversion of another eligible entity into an LLC pursuant to Part 2 of Article 9 of this Chapter.

An LLC is formed at the time the articles of organization filed by the Secretary of State become effective. Filing of the articles of organization by the Secretary of State is conclusive proof that all conditions to the formation of the LLC have been satisfied except in a proceeding by the State to cancel or revoke the articles of organization or involuntarily dissolve the LLC.

If initial members are not identified in the articles of organization of an LLC in the manner provided in G.S. 57D-3-01(a)(1), the organizer or organizers shall either identify the initial members of the LLC or dissolve the LLC. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, all decisions to be made by the organizers require the approval of a majority of the organizers.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-2-21.
Articles of organization.

The articles of organization must include the following information:

A name of the LLC that satisfies the provisions of

G.S. 55D-20

and

G.S. 55D-21

.

The name and address of each person executing the articles of organization and whether the person is executing the articles of organization in the capacity of a member or an organizer.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the LLC’s initial registered office, the county in which the initial registered office is located, and the name of the LLC’s initial registered agent at that address.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the LLC’s principal office, if any, and the county in which the principal office, if any, is located.

If the LLC is to render professional services and is subject to

G.S. 57D-2-02

as a professional limited liability company, the professional services to be rendered by the LLC.

The articles of organization may include any other provision that is or may be included in an operating agreement.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-2-22.
Amendment of articles of organization.

An LLC may amend its articles of organization to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of organization or to delete a provision that is not required to be included in the articles of organization. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of organization is determined as of the effective date of the amendment. The LLC shall amend or otherwise correct its articles of organization when (i) there is a change in the name of the LLC or (ii) they contain an inaccurate statement.

Any amendment to the articles of organization must be approved by either of the following:

All of the members.

If no member of the LLC has been identified in the manner provided in this Chapter, a majority of the organizers.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-2-23.
Restated articles of organization.

An LLC may restate its articles of organization at any time.

The restated articles of organization may include one or more amendments to the articles of organization. The restated articles of organization shall include a statement of the address of the current registered office and the name of the current registered agent of the LLC.

An LLC restating its articles of organization must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of restatement that include the following:

The name of the LLC.

Attached as an exhibit thereto, the text of the restated articles of organization.

A statement that the restated articles of organization do not contain an amendment or, if the articles of organization do contain an amendment, a statement that there is an amendment that was duly adopted by the LLC.

Restated articles of organization supersede the original articles of organization as theretofore amended.

The Secretary of State may certify restated articles of organization as the articles of organization currently in effect without including the other information required by subsection (c) of this section.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-2-24.
Annual report for Secretary of State.

Excluding professional limited liability companies governed by

G.S. 57D-2-02

, each LLC and each foreign LLC authorized to transact business in this State must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing annual reports on a form prescribed by, and in the manner required by, the Secretary of State and as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section. Each annual report must specify the year for which the report applies and provide the information required by this subsection. The information must be current as of the date the limited liability company completes the report. If the information in the limited liability company’s most recent annual report has not changed, the limited liability company may certify in its annual report that the information has not changed in lieu of restating the information.The following information must be included in each annual report:

The name of the limited liability company and, in the case of a foreign LLC, any different name that the foreign LLC is authorized under Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes to use to transact business in this State, as provided in the foreign LLC’s certificate of authority.

In the case of a foreign LLC, the name of the jurisdiction under whose law the foreign LLC is organized.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the limited liability company’s registered office in the State, the county in which the registered office is located, the name of its registered agent at that office, and a statement of any change of the registered office or registered agent.

The address and telephone number of its principal office.

The names, titles, and business addresses of the limited liability company’s principal company officials.

A brief description of the nature of its business.

(a1)

The Secretary of State shall also provide appropriate space and instructions on the annual report form for a limited liability company to voluntarily indicate whether or not it is a veteran-owned small business or a service-disabled veteran-owned small business.

The Secretary of State must notify limited liability companies of the annual report filing requirement. The first annual report of a limited liability company is due to be delivered to the Secretary of State by April 15 of the year following (i) in the case of an LLC, the calendar year in which the LLC’s articles of organization or articles of organization and conversion filed by the Secretary of State become effective or (ii) in the case of a foreign LLC, the calendar year in which the Secretary of State issues to the foreign LLC a certificate of authority to transact business in this State.The limited liability company shall deliver an annual report by April 15 of each subsequent year until (i) in the case of an LLC, the effective date of its articles of dissolution filed by the Secretary of State or the effective date of either a certificate of dissolution for an LLC that is not reinstated under G.S. 57D-6-06(c) or a decree of dissolution that is filed by the Secretary of State as provided in

G.S. 57D-6-05

; (ii) in the case of a foreign LLC, the foreign LLC receives a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State or the Secretary of State revokes the foreign LLC’s certificate of authority under Part 3 of Article 7 of this Chapter; or (iii) in the case of either an LLC or foreign LLC, the effective date of a merger or conversion under Article 9 of this Chapter in which the limited liability company is a merging entity or a converting entity but not the surviving entity.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify the reporting limited liability company in writing and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the information required by this section and delivered to the Secretary of State within 30 days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be timely delivered.

Amendments to any previously filed annual report may be delivered for filing by the Secretary of State at any time for the purpose of correcting, updating, or augmenting the information contained in the annual report.

History.

2013-157, s. 2; 2017-90, s. 2(a).

§ 57D-2-25.
Report of veteran-owned small businesses and service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses.

Using the information reported pursuant to G.S. 57D-2-24(a1), the Secretary of State shall compile summary information on an aggregate basis about the number of veteran-owned small businesses and the number of service-disabled veteran-owned small businesses reporting in this State. The Secretary of State shall annually report this summary information to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs by March 1 of each year.

History.

2017-90, s. 2(b).

§§ 57D-2-26 through 57D-2-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.